Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 343.324 is amended to read:
343.324. A school district may not provide  an abbreviated school day program to a student with
a disability unless all of the following are satisfied:
(1) The student’s individualized education program team:
(a) Recommends that the student should be placed on an abbreviated school day program:
(A) Based on the student’s  individual needs, which may not include consideration of a lack of
school district resources, including:
(i) Licensed or classified staff;
(ii) Availability of training;
(iii) Accessible facilities; and
(iv) Related services, including nursing services and transportation services; and
(B) After the opportunity for the student’s parent or foster parent to meaningfully participate
in a meeting of the  individualized education program team to discuss an abbreviated school day
program placement[ , including ]. A student’s parent or  foster parent must be provided the rea-
sonable opportunity to physically attend the meeting of the individualized education program team
at which the abbreviated school day  program placement is discussed , unless the parent or foster
parent consents to holding the meeting through  telephone or other electronic means or un-
less the holding of a meeting in person is not reasonable due to a public health emergency .
(b) Makes determinations about  the instruction and educational services to be offered to the
student based on the student’s individual needs.
(c) Documents that the school district offered at least  one reasonable alternative placement that
included appropriate supports for the student and that could enable the student to  have meaningful
access to the  same number of hours of instruction and educational services that are provided to the
majority of other students who are in the same grade within the student’s resident school district.
(d) Documents the specific provisions of the abbreviated school day program, including:
(A) How the abbreviated school day program will be designed to:
(i) Support the student’s  return to a school day program that is not an abbreviated school day
program; and
(ii) Make progress toward  the student’s individualized learning goals and progress in the general
curriculum;
Enrolled Senate Bill 742 (SB 742-INTRO) Page 1
(B) The number of hours  of instruction and educational services to be provided to the student
while the student is placed on the abbreviated school day program;
(C) How the student’s progress toward the student’s individualized learning goals  and progress
in the general curriculum will be measured; and
(D) The date by which the student is expected to return  to a school day program that is not an
abbreviated school day program.
(2) Prior to the discussion of the abbreviated school day program placement, the  school district
provides  a  written statement to the student’s parent or foster parent in a language and format ac-
cessible to the parent or foster parent informing the parent or foster parent of:
(a) The student’s right to  have meaningful access to the same number of hours of instruction
and educational services as the majority of other students who  are in the same grade within the
student’s resident school district;
(b) The prohibition on the school district to unilaterally place a student with a disability  on an
abbreviated school day program; and
(c) The parent’s or foster  parent’s right, at any time, to withdraw consent for an abbreviated
school day program placement or to request a meeting  of the student’s individualized education
program team to discuss whether the student should no longer be placed  on an abbreviated school
day program.
(3) The school district provides a written statement summarizing the documentation  described
in subsection (1)(c) and (d) of  this section in a language and format accessible to the parent or foster
parent.
(4) The school district receives a signed acknowledgment from the parent or  foster parent ac-
knowledging receipt of the written statement described in subsection (2) of this section.
(5) The parent or foster parent  provides informed and written consent for the abbreviated school
day program placement.
SECTION 2.  ORS 343.321 is amended to read:
343.321. As used in ORS 343.321 to 343.331:
(1) “Abbreviated school day” means any school day during which a student  with a disability
receives instruction or educational services for fewer hours than the majority of other  students who
are in the same grade within the student’s resident school district.
(2) “Abbreviated school day program” means an education program:
(a) In which a school district restricts access for a student with a  disability to hours of in-
struction  or  educational services to less than the number of hours of instruction or educational
services that are provided to the majority of other students who are in the same grade within the
student’s resident school district; and
(b) That results in a student with a disability having an abbreviated school day for  more than
10 school days per school year.
(3)(a) “Educational services” includes  any social, learning, enrichment, community or support
opportunity or benefit that is offered during the  school day to the majority of other students who
are in the same grade within a student’s resident school district, including:
(A) Passing time between classes;
(B) Time reasonably needed to transport a student between locations during the  school day if
the student receives hours of instruction or educational services in more than one location on the
same day;
(C) Recess;
(D) Nonacademic assemblies and field trips;
(E) Job shadows, internships and community service activities arranged  by the school or school
district;
(F) Optional  school programs held during the school day, including study periods and advisory
periods that are open to the majority of students in the school;
(G) Lunch periods or other meal or snack periods provided to the majority of students of  the
school; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 742 (SB 742-INTRO) Page 2
(H) Reasonable access  to school facilities during noninstructional time that is equal to the ac-
cess available to the majority of other  students who are in the same grade within the student’s
resident school district.
(b) “Educational services” does not include time being transported to or from school  or time
traveling between a classroom and transportation before or after the school day.
(4) “504 Plan” means an education plan developed for a student with a disability in accordance
with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794.
(5) “Foster parent” means the foster parent of a child or ward who is  in the legal custody of the
Department of Human Services as provided in ORS 418.015  or 419B.337 and who has been placed in
substitute care.
(6) “Hours” includes any fraction of an hour.
(7) “Individualized education program team” includes, when applicable, a team  that develops a
504 Plan.
(8) “Informed and written consent” means  that a student’s parent or foster parent has signed
and dated a written consent form affirming that:
(a) The parent or foster parent received the information described in ORS 343.324 (2) and (3);
(b) The parent or foster parent was not asked to provide consent for  an abbreviated school day
program placement before having an opportunity to  meaningfully participate in a meeting of the
individualized education program team  as described in ORS 343.324 ;
(c) The school district offered, and the individualized education  program team considered, at
least one reasonable alternative  placement, as described in ORS 343.324 (1)(c), prior to requesting
that the parent or foster parent provide consent for an abbreviated school day program placement;
(d) The parent or foster parent was informed that the individualized  education program team
will meet at least once every 30  calendar days during the school year unless the parent or foster
parent provides signed consent to meet less frequently as provided in ORS 343.326 (2)(b)(B);
(e) The parent or foster parent was informed that if, during the  school year, the individualized
education program team is scheduled to convene less frequently than once every 30  calendar days
during the abbreviated school  day program, the school district must convene an individualized edu-
cation program team meeting within 14 calendar days of  receiving a written request from the parent
or foster parent for the meeting;
(f) The parent  or foster parent voluntarily signed the consent form for the abbreviated school
day program placement; and
(g) The parent or foster parent was informed of the right  to revoke consent, in writing, to an
abbreviated school day program  placement at any time and informed that the parent or foster parent
is not required to request  or attend an individualized education program team meeting prior to re-
voking consent to an abbreviated school day program placement.
(9)(a) “Instruction” means the time during which a student is:
(A) Engaged in regularly scheduled instruction, learning activities or learning assessments that
are designed to meet Common Curriculum  Goals or grade level academic content standards or en-
gaged in specially designed  instruction that is individualized to support a student to make mean-
ingful progress in the general curriculum.
(B) Working under the direction and supervision  of a licensed or registered teacher, a licensed
career and technical education instructor, a licensed practitioner  or an instructional assistant who
is assigned instructionally related activities and is working under the direct supervision of a li-
censed or registered teacher.
(b) “Instruction” does not include time spent:
(A) Passing between class, at recess, in nonacademic assemblies, on nonacademic field trips,
traveling to or from school, loading or unloading from a school bus at the start  or end of the
student’s school day, participation in optional  programs or participation in study periods or advisory
periods when attendance is not required and no instructional assistance is provided.
(B) In an online learning program during which the student is unable to access the  materials
or benefit  from instruction because the school district has not provided the student with the sup-
Enrolled Senate Bill 742 (SB 742-INTRO) Page 3
ports necessary to access the materials or instruction, including the support  of an instructional as-
sistant, nursing services, adapted materials or other related services identified in  the student’s
individualized education program or 504  Plan as being necessary for a free appropriate public edu-
cation.
(10) “Meaningful access” means access to full-time, quality instruction or  educational services
that is:
(a) Delivered by:
(A) A qualified licensed teacher; or
(B) Qualified classified staff who are under  the direct supervision of a qualified licensed teacher;
and
(b) Synchronous, unless the instruction or educational services are provided by a virtual public
charter school in compliance with ORS chapter 338.
(11) “Parent” includes:
(a) A parent or a legal guardian, other than a state agency.
(b) The student, if the  student is 18 years of age or older or is emancipated pursuant to ORS
419B.550 to 419B.558.
(c) The student’s surrogate, if the student has a surrogate, as defined in ORS 419A.004.
(12) “Resident school district” means the school  district in which a student is a resident under
ORS 339.133.
(13) “School district” includes an education service district.
(14) “Student with a disability” means a student who:
(a) Is eligible for special education and related services, as provided by ORS chapter 343;
(b) Has a disability under section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C.  794, and is
eligible for a 504 Plan; or
(c) Has not  been determined to be eligible for special education and related services, as provided
by ORS chapter 343, or to be eligible for a 504 Plan, but  for whom a request or referral for evalu-
ation for eligibility determination has been made but not yet completed.
(15) “Unilaterally place”  means a placement by a school district without the informed and
written consent of the student’s parent or foster parent.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 742 (SB 742-INTRO) Page 4
Passed by Senate April 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 8, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 742 (SB 742-INTRO) Page 5